Maine, session 132, LD1055.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 424 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 424
NONDISCRIMINATION IN ACCESS TO ANATOMICAL GIFTS AND ORGAN
TRANSPLANTATION
§2150-L. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Anatomical gift. "Anatomical gift" means the donation of part of a human body
for the purpose of transplantation to another person.
2. Auxiliary aid or service. "Auxiliary aid or service" means an aid or service that is
used to provide information to an individual with a cognitive, developmental, intellectual,
neurological or physical disability and is available in a format or manner that allows the
individual to better understand the information.
3. Disability. "Disability" has the same meaning as "physical or mental disability" as
defined in Title 5, section 4553-A.
4. Organ transplant. "Organ transplant" or "organ transplantation" means the
transplantation or transfusion of an anatomical gift into the body of another person for the
purpose of treating or curing a medical condition.
5. Qualified recipient. "Qualified recipient" means an individual who has a disability
and meets the essential eligibility requirements for the recipient of an anatomical gift or
organ transplantation with or without the presence of any of the following:
A. Individuals or entities available to support and assist the individual with an
anatomical gift or organ transplantation;
B. Auxiliary aids or services; and
C. Reasonable modifications to the policies, practices or procedures of a health care
facility or provider, including modifications to allow for:
(1) Communication with one or more individuals or entities available to support or
assist with the recipient's care and medication after surgery or organ
transplantation; or
(2) Consideration of support networks available to the individual, including family
members, friends, home and community-based services or any program or source
of funding available to the individual when determining whether the individual is
able to comply with post-transplant medical requirements.
§2150-M. Prohibition on discrimination
1. Prohibition on discrimination for organ transplants. A health care facility as
defined in section 2053, subsection 3-A or provider may not, solely on the basis of an
individual's disability:
Page 1 - 132LR1549(01)

A. Consider the individual ineligible to receive an anatomical gift or organ transplant;
B. Deny medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including
diagnostic services, evaluation, surgery, counseling and postoperative treatment and
services;
C. Refuse to refer the individual to a transplant hospital or other related specialist for
the purpose of being evaluated for or receiving an organ transplant;
D. Refuse to place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list; or
E. Place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list at a lower-priority
position than the position at which the individual would have been placed if the
individual did not have a disability.
2. Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a health care facility or provider may
take an individual's disability into account when making treatment or coverage
recommendations or decisions, solely to the extent that the disability has been found by a
provider, following an individualized evaluation of the individual, to be medically
significant to the provision of the anatomical gift or organ transplant.
3. Third-party supports. If an individual has the necessary support system to assist
the individual in complying with post-transplant medical requirements, a health care
facility or provider may not consider the individual's inability to independently comply
with post-transplant medical requirements to be medically significant for the purposes of
subsection 2.
4. Required accommodations. Health care facilities and providers shall:
A. Make reasonable modifications to policies, practices and procedures to allow
individuals with disabilities access to transplantation-related services, including
diagnostic services, surgery, coverage, postoperative treatment or counseling, unless
the health care facility or provider demonstrates that making such modifications would
fundamentally alter the nature of the services provided; and
B. Take reasonable and necessary steps to ensure that an individual with a disability is
not denied medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including
diagnostic services, surgery, postoperative treatment or counseling due to the absence
of auxiliary aids or services, unless the health care facility or provider demonstrated
that taking such steps would fundamentally alter the nature of the medical services or
other services related to organ transplantation or would result in an undue burden on
the health care facility or provider.
5. Referral or recommendation not required. A health care facility or provider is
not required to make a referral or recommendation for or to perform a medically
inappropriate organ transplant.
6. Injunctive or equitable relief. Whenever it appears that a health care facility or
provider is violating any of the provisions of this section, the affected individual may
commence a civil action in Superior Court for injunctive or equitable relief against the
health care facility or provider for purposes of enforcing compliance. The court may grant
injunctive or other equitable relief, including:
A. Requiring auxiliary aids or services to be made available for a qualified recipient;
Page 2 - 132LR1549(01)

B. Requiring the modification of a policy, practice or procedure of a health care facility
or provider; and
C. Requiring health care facilities be made readily accessible to and usable by a
qualified recipient.
This subsection is not intended to limit or replace available remedies under the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 United States Code, Section 12101 et seq., as
amended or any other applicable federal law.
This subsection does not create a right to compensatory or punitive damages against a
health care facility or provider.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4320-L, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Organ transplants. A carrier that offers, issues or renews a health benefit plan that
provides coverage for anatomical gifts as defined in Title 22, section 2150-L, subsection 1,
organ transplants as defined in Title 22, section 2150-L, subsection 4 or related treatments
or services may not, solely on the basis of a covered individual's disability:
A. Deny coverage to a covered individual for an organ transplant or related treatment
or services;
B. Decline or limit coverage of a covered individual solely for the purpose of avoiding
the requirements of this subsection; or
C. Penalize a covered individual or reduce or limit coverage for a covered individual
for health care services related to organ transplantation as determined in consultation
with the provider and the covered individual or the covered individual's representative.
This subsection does not require a carrier to provide coverage for the donation of an
anatomical gift, an organ transplant or related treatment or services.